Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] HATE CRIME REPORTING

§846-51 Definitions. As used in this
part, the following terms have the following meanings:

"Gender identity or expression"
includes a person's actual or perceived gender, as well as a person's gender
identity, gender-related self-image, gender-related appearance, or
gender-related expression; regardless of whether that gender identity,
gender-related self-image, gender-related appearance, or gender-related
expression is different from that traditionally associated with the person's
sex at birth.

"Hate crime" means any criminal act
in which the perpetrator intentionally selected a victim, or in the case of a
property crime, the property that was the object of a crime, because of
hostility toward the actual or perceived race, religion, disability, ethnicity,
national origin, gender identity or expression, or sexual orientation of any
person.

"Hate crime data" means information,
incident reports, records, and statistics relating to hate crimes, collected by
the attorney general.

"Incident report" means an account of
occurrence of a hate crime received or collected by the attorney general.

"Sexual orientation" means:

(1) Having a preference for heterosexuality,
homosexuality, or bisexuality;

(2) Having a history of any one or more of these
preferences; or

(3) Being identified with any one or more of these
preferences. [L 2001, c 240, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 33, §§1, 3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next